Arkansas, session 2025, SB245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas State University, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for costs of construction of a College of Veterinary Medicine
facility, in a sum not to exceed .................................$4,000,000.
(B) for costs of construction of the Center for Advanced Materials and
Steel Manufacturing, in a sum not to exceed ......................$3,000,000.
(C) for campus buildings deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(D) for campus wide building entrance security and card access, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$1,000,000.
(E) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$740,000.
(F) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .......$5,210,000.
(G) for the purchase, replacement, and renewal of equipment and library
holdings, in a sum not to exceed .................................$4,509,554.
*HAR048*
02/17/2025 10:28:24 AM HAR048

SB245
(H) for construction, renovation, maintenance, equipment, personal
services and operating expenses of the various institutions and entities of
the Arkansas State University System, in a sum not to exceed ....$25,000,000.

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS TECH UNIVERSITY. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas Tech University, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for Witherspoon interior renovation, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,875,000.
(B) for utility upgrades, in a sum not to exceed ...........$3,032,000.
(C) for technology upgrades, in a sum not to exceed ........$4,093,000.
(D) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .......$3,620,000.
(E) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .......$4,100,000.
(F) for the purchase, replacement, and renewal of equipment and library
holdings, in a sum not to exceed .................................$1,321,412.
(G) for Collegiate Center roof replacement and interior renovation, in
a sum not to exceed ................................................$691,900.
(H) for critical maintenance for the Ozark Campus, in a sum not to
exceed ..............................................................$20,000.
(I) for deferred maintenance for the Ozark Campus, in a sum not to
exceed .............................................................$210,000.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - HENDERSON STATE UNIVERSITY. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Henderson State University, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for renovation of Newberry Hall, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$1,200,000.
(B) for Womack Hall, in a sum not to exceed ..................$800,000.
(C) for renovation of the Russell Fine Arts Building, in a sum not to
exceed ...........................................................$1,000,000.
(D) for renovation of Smith Hall, in a sum not to exceed ...$2,500,000.
(E) for renovation of Wells Gym, in a sum not to exceed ....$2,000,000.
(F) for renovation of Huie Library, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$1,500,000.
(G) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .......$3,120,000.
(H) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .......$2,440,000.
02/17/2025 10:28:24 AM HAR048

SB245
(I) for the purchase, replacement, and renewal of equipment and library
holdings, in a sum not to exceed ...................................$503,642.

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - SOUTHERN ARKANSAS UNIVERSITY. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Southern Arkansas University, to be payable from
the Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for costs of HVAC upgrades, in a sum not to exceed .....$3,783,000.
(B) for technology upgrades, in a sum not to exceed ........$3,559,250.
(C) for storm drain lines, in a sum not to exceed ..........$1,000,750.
(D) for sewer lines, in a sum not to exceed ..................$657,000.
(E) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$540,000.
(F) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .......$3,410,000.
(G) for the purchase, replacement, and renewal of equipment and library
holdings, in a sum not to exceed .................................$1,227,623.

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FOR MEDICAL SCIENCES.
There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical
Sciences, to be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, the
following:
(A) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .......$4,900,000.
(B) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed ......$13,600,000.
(C) for the purchase, replacement, and renewal of equipment and library
holdings, in a sum not to exceed .................................$2,535,302.

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for restoration of the Agriculture Building, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(B) for restoration/addition to the John A. White, Jr. Engineering
Hall, in a sum not to exceed .....................................$2,000,000.
(C) for restoration of the Fine Arts Center and University Theatre, in
a sum not to exceed ..............................................$2,000,000.
(D) for restoration of Memorial Hall, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(E) for renovation of Kimpel Hall and the Office Tower, in a sum not to
02/17/2025 10:28:24 AM HAR048

SB245
exceed ...........................................................$2,000,000.
(F) for renovation of the Business Building, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(G) for critical maintenance for the U of A - Fayetteville, in a sum
not to exceed ....................................................$1,850,000.
(H) for deferred maintenance for the U of A - Fayetteville, in a sum
not to exceed ....................................................$9,010,000.
(I) for the purchase, replacement, and renewal of equipment and library
holdings for the U of A - Fayetteville, in a sum not to exceed ...$7,782,624.
(J) for HVAC system replacement of the Arkansas Archeological Survey,
in a sum not to exceed ...........................................$1,175,000.
(K) for archeological data/object security and accessibility, in a sum
not to exceed ......................................................$396,400.
(L) for remote sensing and archeological object analysis, in a sum not
to exceed ..........................................................$306,989.
(M) for critical maintenance of the Arkansas Archeological Survey, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$120,000.
(N) for deferred maintenance of the Arkansas Archeological Survey, in a
sum not to exceed ...................................................$90,000.
(O) for telecommunications shelter power reliability, in a sum not to
exceed .............................................................$285,000.
(P) for telecommunications shelter facility upgrades, in a sum not to
exceed ..............................................................$39,000.
(Q) for telecommunications shelter security enhancements, in a sum not
to exceed ...........................................................$91,500.
(R) for fiber optic network transmission equipment lifecycle
management, in a sum not to exceed .................................$450,000.
(S) for costs of construction of the Downtown Arts Center, in a sum not
to exceed ........................................................$1,150,000.
(T) for costs of construction of the Wellness Center, in a sum not to
exceed ...........................................................$1,000,000.
(U) for STEM Research Lab upgrades, in a sum not to exceed ...$350,000.
(V) for costs of construction for System Office expansion, in a sum not
to exceed ........................................................$2,198,000.
(W) for renovation of the Pines Cabin, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$302,000.
02/17/2025 10:28:24 AM HAR048

SB245
(X) for construction, renovation, maintenance, equipment, personal
services and operating expenses of the various institutions and entities of
the University of Arkansas System, in a sum not to exceed .......$25,000,000.
(Y) for critical maintenance for the U of A - System, in a sum not to
exceed ..............................................................$50,000.
(Z) for deferred maintenance for the U of A - System, in a sum not to
exceed ..............................................................$50,000.
(AA) for costs of construction of the Lonoke Extension Center
expansion, in a sum not to exceed ................................$2,100,000.
(AB) for critical maintenance for the U of A - Division of Agriculture,
in a sum not to exceed .............................................$910,000.
(AC) for deferred maintenance for the U of A - Division of Agriculture,
in a sum not to exceed ...........................................$1,930,000.

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT FORT SMITH. There
is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Fort Smith, to be
payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for hazardous waste storage, in a sum not to exceed ....$2,000,000.
(B) for Sebastian Commons columns, in a sum not to exceed ..$2,000,000.
(C) for renovation of the Center for Workforce Development, in a sum
not to exceed ....................................................$2,000,000.
(D) for cold and hot water district loops, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(E) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$940,000.
(F) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .......$1,020,000.
(G) for the purchase, replacement, and renewal of equipment and library
holdings, in a sum not to exceed ...................................$747,453.

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT LITTLE ROCK.
There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Little Rock,
to be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for technology infrastructure improvements, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(B) for campus security improvements, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(C) for renovation of the Speech Building, in a sum not to exceed
02/17/2025 10:28:24 AM HAR048

SB245
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(D) for costs of construction of the Nanotechnology Center (CINS), in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$2,000,000.
(E) for classroom technology improvements, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(F) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed ......$14,190,000.
(G) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .......$8,130,000.
(H) for the purchase, replacement, and renewal of equipment and library
holdings, in a sum not to exceed .................................$2,041,488.

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT MONTICELLO. There
is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Monticello, to be
payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for costs of construction of the Allied Health Building, in a sum
not to exceed ....................................................$2,500,000.
(B) for HVAC upgrades for the Memorial Classroom Building and Babin
Business Center, in a sum not to exceed ..........................$2,000,000.
(C) for renovation of the Fine Arts Center, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(D) for renovation of the Music Building, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(E) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .......$6,520,000.
(F) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .......$2,900,000.
(G) for the purchase, replacement, and renewal of equipment and library
holdings, in a sum not to exceed ...................................$543,508.
(H) for costs of construction of the Workforce/Collegiate Center on the
Crossett campus, in a sum not to exceed ..........................$2,500,000.
(I) for critical maintenance for the Crossett campus, in a sum not to
exceed .............................................................$120,000.
(J) for deferred maintenance for the Crossett campus, in a sum not to
exceed .............................................................$140,000.
(K) for costs of construction of the General Education Building on the
McGehee campus, in a sum not to exceed ...........................$2,500,000.
(L) for critical maintenance for the McGehee campus, in a sum not to
exceed .............................................................$220,000.
(M) for deferred maintenance for the McGehee campus, in a sum not to
02/17/2025 10:28:24 AM HAR048

SB245
exceed .............................................................$170,000.

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT PINE BLUFF.
There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff, to
be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for renovation for fire protection, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(B) for renovation of dormitory, in a sum not to exceed ....$2,000,000.
(C) for renovation of police station, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(D) for renovation of restrooms, in a sum not to exceed ......$500,000.
(E) for domestic water upgrades, in a sum not to exceed ......$500,000.
(F) for elevator upgrades and modernization, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$500,000.
(G) for campus security fencing, in a sum not to exceed ......$500,000.
(H) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$540,000.
(I) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .......$2,390,000.
(J) for the purchase, replacement, and renewal of equipment and library
holdings, in a sum not to exceed ...................................$421,268.

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF CENTRAL ARKANSAS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the University of Central Arkansas, to be payable
from the Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for costs of construction of a multi-purpose sports facility, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$2,500,000.
(B) for renovation/replacement of the Lewis Science Center, in a sum
not to exceed ....................................................$2,500,000.
(C) for renovation of Mashburn Hall, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,500,000.
(D) for renovation of Old Main, in a sum not to exceed .....$2,500,000.
(E) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .......$3,400,000.
(F) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .......$7,540,000.
(G) for the purchase, replacement, and renewal of equipment and library
holdings, in a sum not to exceed .................................$2,627,252.

SECTION 12. DISBURSEMENT CONTROLS. (A) No contract may be awarded nor
02/17/2025 10:28:24 AM HAR048

SB245
obligations otherwise incurred in relation to the project or projects
described herein in excess of the State Treasury funds actually available
therefor as provided by law. Provided, however, that institutions and
agencies listed herein shall have the authority to accept and use grants and
donations including Federal funds, and to use its unobligated cash income or
funds, or both available to it, for the purpose of supplementing the State
Treasury funds for financing the entire costs of the project or projects
enumerated herein. Provided further, that the appropriations and funds
otherwise provided by the General Assembly for Maintenance and General
Operations of the agency or institutions receiving appropriation herein shall
not be used for any of the purposes as appropriated in this act.
(B) The restrictions of any applicable provisions of the State
Purchasing Law, the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, the
Revenue Stabilization Law and any other applicable fiscal control laws of
this State and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of any funds provided by this act unless specifically provided
otherwise by law.

SECTION 13. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 14. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
02/17/2025 10:28:24 AM HAR048

SB245
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

































02/17/2025 10:28:24 AM HAR048